Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2620
Sales of cattle; contract voidable by seller.

Any contract to purchase cattle for slaughter that is in violation of section 54-2617 or 54-2619 is voidable by the seller.

Laws 1999, LB 835, § 20.